Maryland, session 2026, HB1065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–1205.
(a) The State shall develop plans, adopt regulations, and implement programs
that reduce statewide greenhouse gas emissions in accordance with this subtitle.
(g) (1) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection apply only to persons who
engaged in manufacturing in 2023.
(2) (i) Unless required by federal law or regulations or existing State
law, regulations adopted by State agencies to implement a final plan may not:
1. Require any manufacturer to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions below the emissions levels for that manufacturer in 2023;
2. Cause an increase in costs to a manufacturer that are
significantly beyond the costs that were incurred by that manufacturer in 2023; or
3. Require any manufacturer that is engaged in the creation
of renewable energy components or technology aimed at greenhouse gas emissions
reductions to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
(ii) Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may not be construed to
exempt greenhouse gas emissions sources in the State’s manufacturing sector from the
obligation to comply with:
1. Greenhouse gas emissions monitoring, recordkeeping, and
reporting requirements for which the Department had existing authority under § 2–301(a)
of this title on or before October 1, 2009; or
2. Greenhouse gas emissions reductions required of the
manufacturing sector as a result of the State’s implementation of the Regional Greenhouse
Gas Initiative.
(3) A regulation adopted by a State agency for the purpose of reducing
greenhouse gas emissions in accordance with this section may not be construed to result in
a significant increase in costs to the State’s manufacturing sector unless the source would
not incur the cost increase but for the new regulation.

HOUSE BILL 1065 3
9–289.
(a) (1) In this part, “coal combustion by–product” means the residue generated
by or resulting from the burning of coal.
(2) “Coal combustion by–product” includes:
(i) Fly ash;
(ii) Bottom ash;
(iii) Boiler slag;
(iv) Pozzolan, as defined in § 15–407 of this article; and
(v) Solid residuals removed by air pollution control devices from the
flue gas and combustion chambers of coal–burning furnaces and boilers.
9–292.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “GRANT PROGRAM” MEANS THE COAL COMBUSTION
BY–PRODUCT MATERIALS GRANT PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCT MATERIALS GRANT
PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE GRANT PROGRAM IS TO AWARD GRANTS TO
ELIGIBLE MANUFACTURERS OF CEMENT, CONCRETE, OR CONSTRUCTION
MATERIALS IN THE STATE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ADMINISTER THE GRANT PROGRAM;
(2) IDENTIFY AND APPLY FOR FUNDING FOR THE GRANT PROGRAM;
AND
(3) IN COORDINATION WITH THE MARYLAND ENERGY
ADMINISTRATION, AUDIT AND CERTIFY GRANTS AWARDED UNDER THE GRANT
PROGRAM.
(E) ELIGIBLE MANUFACTURERS OF CEMENT, CONCRETE, OR
CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS SHALL, TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE DEPARTMENT:

HOUSE BILL 1065
(1) (I) ACCEPT COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS SOURCED FROM
THE STATE AS FEEDSTOCK FOR THE CEMENT, CONCRETE, OR CONSTRUCTION
MATERIALS;
(II) PROCESS THE COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS
APPROPRIATELY; AND
(III) PRODUCE THE FINISHED CEMENT, CONCRETE, OR
CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS USING THE STATE–SOURCED FEEDSTOCK;
(2) FOR PROJECTS IN AND NEAR COMMUNITIES IMPACTED BY THE
GENERATION OF COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS:
(I) CREATE JOBS LOCATED IN COMMUNITIES IMPACTED BY
THE GENERATION OF COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS THAT MEET:
1. PREVAILING WAGE STANDARDS; OR
2. STANDARDS SET BY AN APPLICABLE COMMUNITY
BENEFITS AGREEMENT OR WORKFORCE PARTICIPATION PLAN; AND
(II) PRIORITIZE:
1. EMPLOYMENT OF LOCAL RESIDENTS; AND
2. THE USE OF INTERNSHIPS, APPRENTICESHIPS, AND
TRAINING PROGRAMS IN CONSTRUCTION AND COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCT
REUSE; AND
(3) DEMONSTRATE MEASURABLE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS
REDUCTION BENEFITS THROUGH THE USE OF THE STATE–SOURCED FEEDSTOCK
COMPARED WITH CONVENTIONAL FEEDSTOCK.
(F) NOTWITHSTANDING § 2–1205(G) OF THIS ARTICLE, AN ELIGIBLE
MANUFACTURER OF CEMENT, CONCRETE, OR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS MAY BE
ELIGIBLE FOR GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS RELIEF OR CREDIT RECOGNITION FOR
EMISSIONS LEVELS BELOW LEVELS FOR THAT MANUFACTURER IN 2023.
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
THIS SECTION.
(2) REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1065 5
(I) INCLUDE THE METHOD BY WHICH A GRANT AMOUNT IS
DETERMINED BASED ON THE TONNAGE OF STATE–SOURCED COAL COMBUSTION
BY–PRODUCTS USED BY AN ELIGIBLE MANUFACTURER ABOVE A THRESHOLD
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) ESTABLISH CRITERIA FOR STATE–SOURCED COAL
COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS THAT:
1. INCLUDE ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW OF SOURCES AND
METHODS OF TRANSPORT IN ORDER TO ENSURE NO INCREASE IN RISK TO
GROUNDWATER OR AIR EMISSIONS;
2. ENSURE THAT REUSED COAL COMBUSTION
BY–PRODUCTS MEET ENVIRONMENTAL SAFETY STANDARDS WITH RESPECT TO:
A. LEACHING;
B. QUALITY OF REUSE; AND
C. TRACEABILITY; AND
3. ACCOUNT FOR THE MONITORING AND REPORTING OF
APPLICABLE CONTAMINANTS IN THE REUSE OF COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS.
(H) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, ELIGIBLE MANUFACTURERS THAT RECEIVED A GRANT UNDER THE
GRANT PROGRAM SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT ON:
(I) TONNAGE OF COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS USED;
(II) JOBS CREATED AND LOCATIONS OF THE JOBS, WITH
EMPHASIS ON THE CREATION OF JOBS IN COMMUNITIES IMPACTED BY THE
GENERATION OF COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS; AND
(III) REDUCTIONS ACHIEVED WITH RESPECT TO GREENHOUSE
GAS EMISSIONS.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) WITH RESPECT TO THE GRANT PROGRAM:

HOUSE BILL 1065
1. TONNAGE OF STATE–SOURCED COAL COMBUSTION
BY–PRODUCTS USED;
2. GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTIONS
ACHIEVED;
3. JOBS CREATED, DISAGGREGATED BY COMMUNITIES
IMPACTED BY THE GENERATION OF COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS;
4. THE NUMBER OF GRANTS AWARDED; AND
5. ANY ENVIRONMENTAL OR PUBLIC HEALTH
INCIDENTS REPORTED WITH RESPECT TO THE REUSE OF COAL COMBUSTION
BY–PRODUCTS; AND
(II) THE NUMBER OF ELIGIBLE PROJECTS GIVEN PREFERENCE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 14–419 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE.
(3) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2031, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY:
(I) AN EVALUATION OF THE GRANT PROGRAM, INCLUDING
TOTAL JOBS CREATED AND ENVIRONMENTAL OUTCOMES; AND
(II) RECOMMENDED ADJUSTMENTS TO THE GRANT PROGRAM.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–419.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–289 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “ELIGIBLE PROJECT” MEANS A PROJECT THAT RECEIVES
GREATER THAN 50% OF ITS PROJECT COSTS FROM THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 1065 7
(B) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND FOR ELIGIBLE PROJECTS, EACH
UNIT OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL GIVE PREFERENCE TO BIDS THAT:
(1) USE CERTIFIED STATE–SOURCED COAL COMBUSTION
BY–PRODUCTS TO PRODUCE CEMENT, CONCRETE, OR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–292 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; AND
(2) DEMONSTRATE A QUANTIFIED REDUCTION IN EMBODIED
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS BELOW A BASELINE CEMENT MIX, EVIDENCED BY AN
ENVIRONMENTAL PRODUCT DECLARATION OR LIFE–CYCLE ASSESSMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that Section 1 of this Act be interpreted consistent with Chapters 201 and 202 of
the Acts of the General Assembly of 2023.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.